Washington statutes.
RCW 1.20.052

Permanent daylight saving time—Intent. (Contingent repeal.)

Under federal law as it exists on July 28, 2019, states are not permitted to observe daylight saving time year-round. If the United States congress amends federal law to authorize states to observe daylight saving time year-round, the legislature intends that Washington state make daylight saving time the permanent time of the state and all of its political subdivisions.

[ 2019 c 297 s 1.]

NOTES:

Reviser's note: 2019 c 297 contains a contingent repeal section and a contingent effective date section. This section and RCW 1.20.050 and 1.20.051 will be repealed under 2019 c 297 s 4 on the date provided in 2019 c 297 s 5 when the contingency in 2019 c 297 s 5 occurs.

Contingent repeal—2019 c 297: "The following acts or parts of acts are each repealed:

(1) RCW 1.20.050 (Standard time—Daylight saving time) and 1953 c 2 s 1;

(2) RCW 1.20.051 (Daylight saving time) and 2018 c 22 s 2, 1963 c 14 s 1, & 1961 c 3 s 1; and

(3) RCW 1.20.052 and 2019 c 297 s 1." [ 2019 c 297 s 4.]

Contingent effective date—2019 c 297: See note following RCW 1.20.055.